Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.876

Missing and murdered indigenous women, other indigenous persons—Protocol—Training.

(1) The Washington state patrol must develop a best practices protocol for law enforcement response to missing persons reports for indigenous women and other indigenous persons. The protocol must include steps that law enforcement should take upon receiving a missing persons report for an indigenous woman or other indigenous person.

(2) The governor's office of Indian affairs must provide the Washington state patrol with government-to-government training, and must work with the Washington state patrol to schedule and facilitate the training.

[ 2019 c 127 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 127: See note following RCW 43.43.874.